test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-verbs_gt-norm.yaml
    bata+V+Inf: bata
    brúka+V+Inf: brúka
    brúka+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: brúkar
    brúka+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: brúkti
    brúka+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: brúktu
    brúka+V+Sup: brúkt
    skapa+V+Inf: skapa
    feila+V+Inf: feila
    knúsa+V+Inf: knúsa
    meina+V+Inf: meina
    brúka+V+Inf: brúka
    raka+V+Inf: raka
    rósa+V+Inf: rósa
    slúka+V+Inf: slúka
    tjena+V+Inf: tjena
    skapa+V+Inf: skapa
    áa+V+Inf: áa
    æla+V+Inf: æla
    æra+V+Inf: æra
    æra+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: ærar
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: æraði
    æra+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: æraðu
    æra+V+Sup: ærað
    æra+V+PrfPrc: æraður
    ætla+V+Inf: ætla
    ætta+V+Inf: ætta
    leika+V+Inf: leika
    aftna+V+Inf: aftna
    aftra+V+Inf: aftra
    aga+V+Inf: aga
    agga+V+Inf: agga
    játta+V+Inf: játta
    kalla+V+Inf: kalla
    aksla+V+Inf: aksla
    akta+V+Inf: akta
    ála+V+Inf: ála
    alda+V+Inf: alda
    friða+V+Inf: friða
    líkna+V+Inf: líkna
    alska+V+Inf: alska
    alúna+V+Inf: alúna
    alva+V+Inf: alva
    ama+V+Inf: ama
    ambæta+V+Inf: ambæta
    ampa+V+Inf: ampa
    ampilára+V+Inf: ampilára
    ána+V+Inf: ána
    anda+V+Inf: anda
    varpa+V+Inf: varpa
    anga+V+Inf: anga
    angra+V+Inf: angra
    anka+V+Inf: anka
    ankra+V+Inf: ankra
    náma+V+Inf: náma
    ansa+V+Inf: ansa
    apa+V+Inf: apa
    rætta+V+Inf: rætta
    arga+V+Inf: arga
    arma+V+Inf: arma
    árna+V+Inf: árna
    arta+V+Inf: arta
    arva+V+Inf: arva
    asa+V+Inf: asa
    saka+V+Inf: saka
    sanna+V+Inf: sanna
    seyma+V+Inf: seyma
    asfalta+V+Inf: asfalta
    asfaltera+V+Inf: asfaltera
    skriva+V+Inf: skriva
    assa+V+Inf: assa
    tala+V+Inf: tala
    tekna+V+Inf: tekna
    laga+V+Inf: laga
    atra+V+Inf: atra
    støða+V+Inf: støða
    vara+V+Inf: vara
    blóma+V+Inf: blóma
    blomstra+V+Inf: blomstra
    brodda+V+Inf: brodda
    brongla+V+Inf: brongla
    dubba+V+Inf: dubba
    dúka+V+Inf: dúka
    dúna+V+Inf: dúna
    verka+V+Inf: verka
    faksa+V+Inf: faksa
    feitta+V+Inf: feitta
    fita+V+Inf: fita
    fjaðra+V+Inf: fjaðra
    fólka+V+Inf: fólka
    halga+V+Inf: halga
    høvda+V+Inf: høvda
    virka+V+Inf: virka
    kanna+V+Inf: kanna
    kristna+V+Inf: kristna
    kvista+V+Inf: kvista
    laga+V+Inf: laga
    lima+V+Inf: lima
    litka+V+Inf: litka
    líva+V+Inf: líva
    lukta+V+Inf: lukta
    lúsa+V+Inf: lúsa
    luta+V+Inf: luta
    lutta+V+Inf: lutta
    makta+V+Inf: makta
    manna+V+Inf: manna
    marka+V+Inf: marka
    mergja+V+Inf: mergja
    mona+V+Inf: mona
    mynda+V+Inf: mynda
    nakka+V+Inf: nakka
    nokta+V+Inf: nokta
    rætta+V+Inf: rætta
    rita+V+Inf: rita
    rokna+V+Inf: rokna
    saka+V+Inf: saka
    sanna+V+Inf: sanna
    skepla+V+Inf: skepla
    skipa+V+Inf: skipa
    spáka+V+Inf: spáka
    sýra+V+Inf: sýra
    tala+V+Inf: tala
    vápna+V+Inf: vápna
    varra+V+Inf: varra
    babba+V+Inf: babba
    babla+V+Inf: babla
    baða+V+Inf: baða
    bága+V+Inf: bága
    bagga+V+Inf: bagga
    baka+V+Inf: baka
    bakka+V+Inf: bakka
    bákna+V+Inf: bákna
    baksa+V+Inf: baksa
    tala+V+Inf: tala
    bála+V+Inf: bála
    baldra+V+Inf: baldra
    baldýra+V+Inf: baldýra
    balla+V+Inf: balla
    balsamera+V+Inf: balsamera
    bana+V+Inf: bana
    banda+V+Inf: banda
    banga+V+Inf: banga
    banka+V+Inf: banka
    banna+V+Inf: banna
    bara+V+Inf: bara
    bardía+V+Inf: bardía
    bardíggja+V+Inf: bardíggja
    barka+V+Inf: barka
    lasta+V+Inf: lasta
    barma+V+Inf: barma
    barna+V+Inf: barna
    tryggja+V+Inf: tryggja
    barva+V+Inf: barva
    baska+V+Inf: baska
    basta+V+Inf: basta
    basúna+V+Inf: basúna
    batna+V+Inf: batna
    beina+V+Inf: beina
    beinka+V+Inf: beinka
    beisa+V+Inf: beisa
    beiska+V+Inf: beiska
    bekla+V+Inf: bekla
    belja+V+Inf: belja
    bella+V+Inf: bella
    bendla+V+Inf: bendla
    bendsla+V+Inf: bendsla
    mála+V+Inf: mála
    berka+V+Inf: berka
    berva+V+Inf: berva
    betonga+V+Inf: betonga
    betra+V+Inf: betra
    beyka+V+Inf: beyka
    bíða+V+Inf: bíða
    bidda+V+Inf: bidda
    biðla+V+Inf: biðla
    bíggja+V+Inf: bíggja
    bika+V+Inf: bika
    bila+V+Inf: bila
    billa+V+Inf: billa
    bimba+V+Inf: bimba
    bipa+V+Inf: bipa
    bírætta+V+Inf: bírætta
    bispa+V+Inf: bispa
    biva+V+Inf: biva
    bjálva+V+Inf: bjálva
    bjarga+V+Inf: bjarga
    bjarva+V+Inf: bjarva
    bjølga+V+Inf: bjølga
    bjóra+V+Inf: bjóra
    blabba+V+Inf: blabba
    blabra+V+Inf: blabra
    blaða+V+Inf: blaða
    blaka+V+Inf: blaka
    blaktra+V+Inf: blaktra
    bláma+V+Inf: bláma
    blána+V+Inf: blána
    blanda+V+Inf: blanda
    blanka+V+Inf: blanka
    blarva+V+Inf: blarva
    steina+V+Inf: steina
    vørra+V+Inf: vørra
    blavra+V+Inf: blavra
    bleiktra+V+Inf: bleiktra
    blekka+V+Inf: blekka
    blenda+V+Inf: blenda
    blesma+V+Inf: blesma
    blessa+V+Inf: blessa
    bletta+V+Inf: bletta
    blíðka+V+Inf: blíðka
    tosa+V+Inf: tosa
    blika+V+Inf: blika
    blikka+V+Inf: blikka
    blikna+V+Inf: blikna
    blinda+V+Inf: blinda
    blinka+V+Inf: blinka
    blinkstra+V+Inf: blinkstra
    bløbba+V+Inf: bløbba
    blóða+V+Inf: blóða
    blóðga+V+Inf: blóðga
    melta+V+Inf: melta
    bløðra+V+Inf: bløðra
    sora+V+Inf: sora
    sorla+V+Inf: sorla
    blógva+V+Inf: blógva
    blóma+V+Inf: blóma
    blomstra+V+Inf: blomstra
    blóta+V+Inf: blóta
    blotna+V+Inf: blotna
    blunda+V+Inf: blunda
    blunka+V+Inf: blunka
    blussa+V+Inf: blussa
    bobba+V+Inf: bobba
    boða+V+Inf: boða
    boga+V+Inf: boga
    bogna+V+Inf: bogna
    bogra+V+Inf: bogra
    bógva+V+Inf: bógva
    bóka+V+Inf: bóka
    bøkja+V+Inf: bøkja
    bøkla+V+Inf: bøkla
    boksa+V+Inf: boksa
    skriva+V+Inf: skriva
    boksla+V+Inf: boksla
    bola+V+Inf: bola
    bóla+V+Inf: bóla
    bøla+V+Inf: bøla
    bøla+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: bølar
    bøla+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: bølaði
    bøla+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: bølaðu
    bøla+V+Sup: bølað
    bøla+V+PrfPrc: bølaður
    bólgna+V+Inf: bólgna
    bólka+V+Inf: bólka
    bolta+V+Inf: bolta
    bólta+V+Inf: bólta
    bølva+V+Inf: bølva
    bona+V+Inf: bona
    bøna+V+Inf: bøna
    bongla+V+Inf: bongla
    boppa+V+Inf: boppa
    bora+V+Inf: bora
    borða+V+Inf: borða
    borga+V+Inf: borga
    skoða+V+Inf: skoða
    bosa+V+Inf: bosa
    bósa+V+Inf: bósa
    bøssa+V+Inf: bøssa
    bóta+V+Inf: bóta
    botna+V+Inf: botna
    kava+V+Inf: kava
    torna+V+Inf: torna
    boykotta+V+Inf: boykotta
    bráa+V+Inf: bráa
    brabba+V+Inf: brabba
    baka+V+Inf: baka
    bráðna+V+Inf: bráðna
    steðga+V+Inf: steðga
    støðga+V+Inf: støðga
    svara+V+Inf: svara
    tagna+V+Inf: tagna
    torna+V+Inf: torna
    bragda+V+Inf: bragda
    bragða+V+Inf: bragða
    bragga+V+Inf: bragga
    braka+V+Inf: braka
    bráka+V+Inf: bráka
    brakka+V+Inf: brakka
    brala+V+Inf: brala
    bralla+V+Inf: bralla
    branda+V+Inf: branda
    eggja+V+Inf: eggja
    branka+V+Inf: branka
    braska+V+Inf: braska
    bratna+V+Inf: bratna
    bredda+V+Inf: bredda
    bregda+V+Inf: bregda
    breggja+V+Inf: breggja
    breiðka+V+Inf: breiðka
    breka+V+Inf: breka
    bremsa+V+Inf: bremsa
    brigða+V+Inf: brigða
    brigda+V+Inf: brigda
    brigsla+V+Inf: brigsla
    brikka+V+Inf: brikka
    bríksla+V+Inf: bríksla
    brima+V+Inf: brima
    brodda+V+Inf: brodda
    brodera+V+Inf: brodera
    brokka+V+Inf: brokka
    brøla+V+Inf: brøla
    brongla+V+Inf: brongla
    bronsa+V+Inf: bronsa
    brosa+V+Inf: brosa
    brósta+V+Inf: brósta
    brotna+V+Inf: brotna
    brúgva+V+Inf: brúgva
    bruka+V+Inf: bruka
    brukna+V+Inf: brukna
    brumma+V+Inf: brumma
    tryggja+V+Inf: tryggja
    brunda+V+Inf: brunda
    brúnka+V+Inf: brúnka
    brunsla+V+Inf: brunsla
    brúsa+V+Inf: brúsa
    brýggja+V+Inf: brýggja
    bryggja+V+Inf: bryggja
    brynja+V+Inf: brynja
    brýnska+V+Inf: brýnska
    brýska+V+Inf: brýska
    buga+V+Inf: buga
    buka+V+Inf: buka
    bukka+V+Inf: bukka
    bukla+V+Inf: bukla
    bukta+V+Inf: bukta
    buldra+V+Inf: buldra
    leika+V+Inf: leika
    bulka+V+Inf: bulka
    bulla+V+Inf: bulla
    bumba+V+Inf: bumba
    bumsa+V+Inf: bumsa
    bunja+V+Inf: bunja
    bunka+V+Inf: bunka
    bunkra+V+Inf: bunkra
    buppa+V+Inf: buppa
    busa+V+Inf: busa
    bussa+V+Inf: bussa
    busta+V+Inf: busta
    buta+V+Inf: buta
    byrða+V+Inf: byrða
    byrja+V+Inf: byrja
    daffa+V+Inf: daffa
    daga+V+Inf: daga
    bóka+V+Inf: bóka
    dagga+V+Inf: dagga
    dagna+V+Inf: dagna
    dala+V+Inf: dala
    dála+V+Inf: dála
    dalda+V+Inf: dalda
    dálka+V+Inf: dálka
    dalla+V+Inf: dalla
    dambla+V+Inf: dambla
    damla+V+Inf: damla
    damma+V+Inf: damma
    dampa+V+Inf: dampa
    dána+V+Inf: dána
    danda+V+Inf: danda
    danga+V+Inf: danga
    dangla+V+Inf: dangla
    dansa+V+Inf: dansa
    danska+V+Inf: danska
    dantilára+V+Inf: dantilára
    dapa+V+Inf: dapa
    dára+V+Inf: dára
    darla+V+Inf: darla
    darra+V+Inf: darra
    darta+V+Inf: darta
    dartla+V+Inf: dartla
    darva+V+Inf: darva
    degna+V+Inf: degna
    deiggja+V+Inf: deiggja
    deigna+V+Inf: deigna
    depla+V+Inf: depla
    deyða+V+Inf: deyða
    klinka+V+Inf: klinka
    reinsa+V+Inf: reinsa
    deyma+V+Inf: deyma
    deysa+V+Inf: deysa
    digga+V+Inf: digga
    dika+V+Inf: dika
    dikka+V+Inf: dikka
    dilda+V+Inf: dilda
    dilla+V+Inf: dilla
    dingla+V+Inf: dingla
    dinta+V+Inf: dinta
    dintla+V+Inf: dintla
    dirka+V+Inf: dirka
    dirla+V+Inf: dirla
    dirra+V+Inf: dirra
    dirta+V+Inf: dirta
    dirtla+V+Inf: dirtla
    dirva+V+Inf: dirva
    disja+V+Inf: disja
    disma+V+Inf: disma
    doða+V+Inf: doða
    dogga+V+Inf: dogga
    døgga+V+Inf: døgga
    dokka+V+Inf: dokka
    dølla+V+Inf: dølla
    dølma+V+Inf: dølma
    dømma+V+Inf: dømma
    donta+V+Inf: donta
    dorma+V+Inf: dorma
    dósa+V+Inf: dósa
    dósna+V+Inf: dósna
    dossa+V+Inf: dossa
    dovna+V+Inf: dovna
    drabba+V+Inf: drabba
    drafsa+V+Inf: drafsa
    dragna+V+Inf: dragna
    dragsa+V+Inf: dragsa
    drála+V+Inf: drála
    dramma+V+Inf: dramma
    dranga+V+Inf: dranga
    drápa+V+Inf: drápa
    drassa+V+Inf: drassa
    dratla+V+Inf: dratla
    dreggja+V+Inf: dreggja
    dregla+V+Inf: dregla
    dreiva+V+Inf: dreiva
    drena+V+Inf: drena
    drevja+V+Inf: drevja
    dreya+V+Inf: dreya
    drifta+V+Inf: drifta
    drifta+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: driftar
    drifta+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: driftaði
    drifta+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: driftaðu
    drifta+V+Sup: driftað
    drifta+V+PrfPrc: driftaður
    dringsla+V+Inf: dringsla
    drísla+V+Inf: drísla
    drísta+V+Inf: drísta
    dritta+V+Inf: dritta
    savna+V+Inf: savna
    drongla+V+Inf: drongla
    drongsla+V+Inf: drongsla
    dropa+V+Inf: dropa
    drukna+V+Inf: drukna
    drunsla+V+Inf: drunsla
    drýggja+V+Inf: drýggja
    drýgsla+V+Inf: drýgsla
    drynja+V+Inf: drynja
    dryppa+V+Inf: dryppa
    drýsla+V+Inf: drýsla
    dubba+V+Inf: dubba
    dudda+V+Inf: dudda
    duffa+V+Inf: duffa
    dugga+V+Inf: dugga
    dugna+V+Inf: dugna
    duka+V+Inf: duka
    dúka+V+Inf: dúka
    dulla+V+Inf: dulla
    dumba+V+Inf: dumba
    dumma+V+Inf: dumma
    dumsa+V+Inf: dumsa
    duna+V+Inf: duna
    dúna+V+Inf: dúna
    dundra+V+Inf: dundra
    dunga+V+Inf: dunga
    dunka+V+Inf: dunka
    nappa+V+Inf: nappa
    dunsla+V+Inf: dunsla
    dúra+V+Inf: dúra
    dúrka+V+Inf: dúrka
    durva+V+Inf: durva
    dusa+V+Inf: dusa
    dúsa+V+Inf: dúsa
    dusma+V+Inf: dusma
    dusta+V+Inf: dusta
    dúva+V+Inf: dúva
    dvína+V+Inf: dvína
    dýggja+V+Inf: dýggja
    dymba+V+Inf: dymba
    dýna+V+Inf: dýna
    dynja+V+Inf: dynja
    dyppa+V+Inf: dyppa
    dýra+V+Inf: dýra
    dyrka+V+Inf: dyrka
    dýrka+V+Inf: dýrka
    líka+V+Inf: líka
    líkna+V+Inf: líkna
    eftna+V+Inf: eftna
    eggja+V+Inf: eggja
    mála+V+Inf: mála
    falda+V+Inf: falda
    henda+V+Inf: henda
    hátta+V+Inf: hátta
    eitra+V+Inf: eitra
    ekkóa+V+Inf: ekkóa
    ekla+V+Inf: ekla
    ekta+V+Inf: ekta
    elda+V+Inf: elda
    elda+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: eldar
    elda+V+Ind+Prt+Sg: eldaði
    elda+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: eldaðu
    elda+V+Sup: eldað
    elda+V+PrfPrc: eldaður
    huga+V+Inf: huga
    elska+V+Inf: elska
    emaljera+V+Inf: emaljera
